North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159B. Joint Municipal Electric Power and Energy Act.
Article 2. Joint Agencies; Municipalities.
§ 159B-11.
General powers of joint agencies; prerequisites to undertaking projects.

Each joint agency shall have all of the rights and powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this Chapter, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the rights and powers:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of the affairs and the conduct of its business, and to prescribe rules, regulations and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties.

To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure.

To acquire and maintain an administrative office building or office at such place or places as it may determine, which building or office may be used or owned alone or together with any other joint agency or agencies, joint municipal assistance agency, municipalities, corporations, associations or persons under such terms and provisions for sharing costs and otherwise as may be determined.

To sue and be sued in its own name, and to plead and be impleaded.

To receive, administer and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any gift, grant or donation of any property or money.

To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or otherwise, or to obtain options for the acquisition of, any property, real or personal, improved or unimproved, including an interest in land less than the fee thereof.

To sell, lease, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, or to grant options for any such purposes with respect to, any real or personal property or interest therein.

To pledge, assign, mortgage or otherwise grant a security interest in any real or personal property or interest therein, including the right and power to pledge, assign or otherwise grant a security interest in any money, rents, charges or other revenues and any proceeds derived by the joint agency from the sales of property, insurance or condemnation awards.

To issue bonds of the joint agency for the purpose of providing funds for any of its corporate purposes.

To study, plan, finance, construct, reconstruct, acquire, improve, enlarge, extend, better, own, operate and maintain one or more projects, either individually or jointly with one or more municipalities in this State or any state contiguous to this State owning electric distribution facilities or with any political subdivisions, agencies or instrumentalities of any state contiguous to this State or with other joint agencies created pursuant to this Chapter, and to pay all or any part of the costs thereof from the proceeds of bonds of the joint agency or from any other available funds of the joint agency; no provisions of law with respect to the acquisition, construction, or operation of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to any project as defined in this Chapter and as authorized by this subdivision unless the General Assembly shall specifically so state.

To authorize the construction, operation or maintenance of any project or projects by any person, firm, association, or corporation, public or private.

To acquire by private negotiated purchase or lease or otherwise an existing project, a project under construction, or other property, either individually or jointly, with one or more municipalities or joint agencies in this State or any state contiguous to this State owning electric distribution facilities or with any political subdivisions, agencies or instrumentalities of any state contiguous to this State or with other joint agencies created pursuant to this Chapter; to acquire by private negotiated purchase or lease or otherwise any facilities for the development, production, manufacture, procurement, handling, storage, fabrication, enrichment, processing or reprocessing of fuel of any kind or any facility or rights with respect to the supply of water, and to enter into agreements by private negotiation or otherwise, for a period not exceeding fifty (50) years, for the development, production, manufacture, procurement, handling, storage, fabrication, enrichment, processing or reprocessing of fuel of any kind or any facility or rights with respect to the supply of water; no provisions of law with respect to the acquisition, construction or operation of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to any agency created pursuant to this Chapter unless the legislature shall specifically so state.

To dispose of by private negotiated sale or lease, or otherwise, an existing project or a project under construction, or to dispose of by private negotiated sale or lease, or otherwise any facilities for the development, production, manufacture, procurement, handling, storage, fabrication, enrichment, processing or reprocessing of fuel of any kind or any facility or rights with respect to the supply of water; no provisions of law with respect to the disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to an agency created pursuant to this Chapter unless the legislature shall specifically so state.

To fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power or energy and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through any project or activity permitted in this Chapter.

(14a)

To fix, charge, and collect payments pursuant to support contracts authorized by G.S. 159B-12(b).

To generate, produce, transmit, deliver, exchange, purchase, sell for resale only, electric power or energy, and to enter into contracts for any or all such purposes.

To negotiate and enter into contracts for the purchase, sale for resale only, exchange, interchange, wheeling, pooling, transmission or use of electric power and energy with any person, firm, association, or corporation, public or private.

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the joint agency under this Chapter, including contracts with persons, firms, associations, or corporations, public or private.

To apply to the appropriate agencies of the State, the United States or any state thereof, and to any other proper agency, for such permits, licenses, certificates or approvals as may be necessary, and to construct, maintain and operate projects and undertake other activities permitted in this Chapter in accordance with such licenses, permits, certificates or approvals, and to obtain, hold and use such licenses, permits, certificates and approvals in the same manner as any other person or operating unit of any other person.

To employ engineers, architects, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, financial advisors and such other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the joint agency and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the joint agency therefor and to select and retain subject to approval of the Local Government Commission the financial consultants, underwriters and bond attorneys to be associated with the issuance of any bonds and to pay for services rendered by underwriters, financial consultants or bond attorneys out of the proceeds of any such issue with regard to which the services were performed.

(19a)

To purchase power and energy, and services and facilities relating to the utilization of power and energy, from any source on behalf of its members and other customers and to furnish, sell, lease, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of, or to grant options for any such purposes with respect to the same, to its members and other customers in such amounts, with such characteristics, for such periods of time and under such terms and conditions as the governing board of the joint agency shall determine.

(19b)

To provide aid and assistance to municipalities, and to act for or on behalf of any municipality, in any activity related to the development and implementation of integrated resource planning, including, but not limited to, the evaluation of resources, generating facilities, alternative energy resources, conservation and load management programs, transmission and distribution facilities, and purchased power options, and related to the development, construction and operation of supply-side and demand-side resources, and to do such other acts and things as provided in Article 3 of this Chapter as if the joint agency were a joint municipal assistance agency, and to carry out the powers granted in this Chapter in relation thereto; to provide aid and assistance to any joint municipal assistance agency in the exercise of its respective powers and functions.

To do all acts and things necessary, convenient or desirable to carry out the purposes, and to exercise the powers granted to the joint agency in this Chapter.

No joint agency shall undertake any project required to be financed, in whole or in part, with the proceeds of bonds without the approval of a majority of its members. Before undertaking any project, a joint agency shall, based upon engineering studies and reports, determine that such project is required to provide for the projected needs for power and energy of its members from and after the date the project is estimated to be placed in normal and continuous operation and for a reasonable period of time thereafter. Prior to or simultaneously with granting a certificate of public convenience and necessity for any such generation project the North Carolina Utilities Commission, in a proceeding instituted pursuant to

G.S. 159B-24

of this Chapter, shall approve such determination. In determining the future power requirements of the members of a joint agency, there shall be taken into account the following:

The economies and efficiencies to be achieved in constructing on a large scale facilities for the generation of electric power and energy;

Needs of the joint agency for reserve and peaking capacity and to meet obligations under pooling and reserve-sharing agreements reasonably related to its needs for power and energy to which the joint agency is or may become a party;

The estimated useful life of such project;

The estimated time necessary for the planning, development, acquisition, or construction of such project and the length of time required in advance to obtain, acquire or construct additional power supply for the members of the joint agency;

The reliability and availability of existing alternative power supply sources and the cost of such existing alternative power supply sources.A determination by the joint agency approved by the North Carolina Utilities Commission based upon appropriate findings of the foregoing matters shall be conclusive as to the appropriateness of a project to provide the needs of the members of a joint agency for power and energy unless a party to the proceeding aggrieved by the determination of said Commission shall file notice of appeal pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes of North Carolina.Nothing herein contained shall prevent a joint agency from undertaking studies to determine whether there is a need for a project or whether such project is feasible.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1977, c. 385, ss. 6-10; 1983, c. 574, ss. 4, 4.1; 1985, c. 212, s. 1; c. 723, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 888, s. 2; 1993, c. 182, s. 1; 1995, c. 412, s. 7; 2015-3, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to cost
recovery
for
acquisition
of
joint
municipal power
agency
ownership interest in generating facilities, see

G.S. 62-133.14

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-3, s. 3, effective April 2, 2015, added subsection designations (a) and (b); made minor punctuation changes throughout; and inserted subdivision (a)(14a).

§ 159B-12.
Sale of capacity and output by a joint agency; support contracts; other contracts with a joint agency.

Any municipality which is a member of the joint agency may contract to buy from the joint agency power and energy for its present or future requirements, including the capacity and output of one or more specified projects. As the creation of a joint agency is an alternative method whereby a municipality may obtain the benefits and assume the responsibilities of ownership in a project, any such contract may provide that the municipality so contracting shall be obligated to make the payments required by the contract whether or not a project is completed, operable or operating and notwithstanding the suspension, interruption, interference, reduction or curtailment of the output of a project or the power and energy contracted for, and that such payments under the contract shall not be subject to any reduction, whether by offset or otherwise, and shall not be conditioned upon the performance or nonperformance of the joint agency or any other member of the joint agency under the contract or any other instrument. Any contract with respect to the sale or purchase of capacity or output of a project entered into between a joint agency and its member municipalities may also provide that if one or more of such municipalities shall default in the payment of its or their obligations with respect to the purchase of said capacity or output, then in that event the remaining member municipalities which are purchasing capacity and output under the contract shall be required to accept and pay for and shall be entitled proportionately to and may use or otherwise dispose of the capacity or output which was to be purchased by the defaulting municipality. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, any such contract with respect to the sale or purchase of capacity, output, power, or energy from a project may extend for a period not exceeding 50 years from the date a project is estimated to be placed in normal continuous operation.

If any municipality which is a member of the joint agency has contracted to buy from the joint agency the capacity and output of one or more specified projects as contemplated by and containing characteristics authorized by subsection (a) of this section, and if the joint agency has acquired one or more projects and financed the acquisition of any project by issuing bonds pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter, and if the joint agency sells or otherwise disposes of any project, and if the proceeds of the sale or other disposition of any project, together with other moneys available to the joint agency for the purpose of paying the bonds, are not sufficient to pay or provide for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all of such bonds issued to finance the acquisition of the existing project or projects, the municipality may enter into a support contract with the joint agency to pay a proportionate share of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on bonds issued by the joint agency to (i) refinance the bonds issued to finance the acquisition of any existing project being sold or otherwise disposed of that are not defeased from other sources, (ii) finance any collateral posting requirements of replacement power supply arrangements entered into by the joint agency, and (iii) finance any required reserves and other costs associated with the support contracts and the issuance of the bonds authorized by

G.S. 159B-14

.As a support contract authorized by this subsection is a replacement for and in lieu of the payment obligations authorized by subsection (a) of this section related to an existing project or projects, any support contract may provide that the contracting municipality is obligated to make the payments required by the support contract unconditionally and without offset, counterclaim, or otherwise, and notwithstanding the performance or nonperformance of the joint agency under the support contract, or of any other municipality entering into a similar support contract with the joint agency, or the delivery of or failure to deliver power or energy or the performance or nonperformance by any party under any related power supply contract. Any support contract entered into between a joint agency and its member municipalities may also provide that if any municipality defaults in the payment of its obligations under the support contract, the remaining member municipalities subject to the contract are required to pay a proportionate share of the defaulted payments.Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the obligations of the municipality under a support contract may extend for a period of 30 years, except for accrued obligations as of the expiration of the period for which the contract may be continued until the accrued obligations are fully satisfied, and, with respect to administrative costs only, for a reasonable period of time thereafter.Obligations under a support contract shall not be taken into account in computing any debt or other limitation that may be imposed by law. Being on account of the refinancing of obligations incurred in connection with the acquisition of a project or projects, the obligations of the municipality under any support contract shall constitute an operating expense of its municipal electric system for all purposes of

G.S. 159-47

and other purposes, save only as may have been duly contracted with bondholders of the municipality.

Any municipality may contract with a joint agency, or may contract indirectly with a joint agency through a joint municipal assistance agency, to implement the provisions of G.S. 159B-11(19a) and (19b). Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, including, but not limited to, the provisions of G.S. 159B-44(13), any contract between a joint agency and a municipality or a joint municipal assistance agency (or between a municipality and a joint municipal assistance agency) to implement the provisions of G.S. 159B-11(19b) may extend for a period not exceeding 30 years; provided, that any such contract in respect of a capital project to be used by or for the benefit of a municipality shall be subject to the prior approval of the Local Government Commission of North Carolina. In reviewing any such contract for approval, said Local Government Commission shall consider the municipality’s debt management procedures and policies, whether the municipality is in default with respect to its debt service obligations and such other matters as said Local Government Commission may believe to have a bearing on whether the contract should be approved.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, the execution and effectiveness of any contracts authorized by this section shall not be subject to any authorizations or approvals by the State or any agency, commission or instrumentality or political subdivision thereof except as in this Chapter specifically required and provided.Payments by a municipality under any contract authorized by this section shall be made solely from the revenues derived from the ownership and operation of the electric system of said municipality and any obligation under such contract shall not constitute a legal or equitable pledge, charge, lien, or encumbrance upon any property of the municipality or upon any of its income, receipts, or revenues, except the revenues of its electric system, and neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the municipality are, or may be, pledged for the payment of any obligation under any such contract. A municipality or joint agency, pursuant to an agreement with a municipality, shall be obligated to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, activities permitted in this Chapter, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the electric system of the municipality sufficient to provide revenues adequate to meet its obligations under any such contract and to pay any and all other amounts payable from or constituting a charge and lien upon such revenues, including amounts sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on general obligation bonds heretofore or hereafter issued by the municipality for purposes related to its electric system and payments pursuant to support contracts authorized by subsection (b) of this section. The willful or negligent failure by any municipality to comply with the obligations applicable to it shall constitute a failure or refusal to comply with the provisions of this Chapter for purposes of

G.S. 159-181(c)

, and the financial powers of the governing board of the municipality that may be vested in the Local Government Commission pursuant to

G.S. 159-181(c)

shall include those powers incident to carrying out the requirements and obligations specified in this section.Payments by any joint municipal assistance agency to any joint agency under any contract or contracts authorized by this section, shall be made solely from the sources specified in such contract or contracts and no other, and any obligation under such contract shall not constitute a legal or equitable pledge, charge, lien, or encumbrance upon any property of the joint municipal assistance agency or upon any of its income, receipts, or revenues, or upon any property of any municipality with which the joint agency or joint municipal assistance agency contracts or upon any of such municipality’s income, receipts, or revenues in each case except such sources so specified. A joint municipal assistance agency shall be obligated to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees, and charges for providing aid and assistance sufficient to provide revenues adequate to meet its obligations under such contract.Any municipality which is a member of a joint agency may furnish the joint agency with money derived solely from the ownership and operation of its electric system or facilities and provide the joint agency with personnel, equipment and property, both real and personal. Any municipality may also provide any services to a joint agency.Any member of a joint agency may contract for, advance or contribute funds derived solely from the ownership and operation of its electric system or facilities to a joint agency as may be agreed upon by the joint agency and the member, and the joint agency shall repay such advances or contributions from proceeds of bonds, from operating revenues or from any other funds of the joint agency, together with interest thereon as may be agreed upon by the member and the joint agency.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1983, c. 574, s. 5; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 888, s. 3; 1995, c. 412, s. 8; 2015-3, s. 4.

Cross References.

As to cost
recovery
for
acquisition
of
joint
municipal power
agency
ownership interest in generating facilities, see

G.S. 62-133.14

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-3, s. 4, effective April 2, 2015, inserted “support contracts” in the section heading; added subsection designations (a), (c) and (d); inserted subsection (b); in the second paragraph of subsection (d), added “and payments pursuant to support contracts authorized by subsection (b) of this section” in the present next-to-last sentence, and added the present last sentence.

§ 159B-13.
Sale of excess capacity and output by a joint agency.

A joint agency may sell or exchange the excess capacity or output of a project not then required by any of its members, for such consideration and for such period and upon such other terms and conditions as may be determined by the parties, to any person, firm, association, or corporation, public or private.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1977, c. 385, s. 11; 1995, c. 412, s. 9.

§ 159B-14.
Bonds of a joint agency.

A joint agency may issue bonds for the purpose of paying the cost of a project and secure both the principal of and interest on the bonds by a pledge of part or all of the revenues derived or to be derived from all or any of its projects, and any additions and betterments thereto or extensions thereof, or from the sale of power and energy and services and facilities related to the utilization of power and energy, or from other activities or facilities permitted in this Chapter, or from contributions or advances from its members. A joint agency may issue bonds that are not for the purpose of paying the cost of a project and secure the bonds solely by a pledge of revenues, solely by a security interest in real or personal property, or by both a pledge of revenues and a security interest in real or personal property. Bonds of a joint agency shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by its governing board and spread upon its minutes.

A joint agency may issue bonds for the purpose of refinancing bonds issued for the purpose of paying the cost of a project, including, but not limited to, paying or providing for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on bonds theretofore issued by a joint agency for the purpose of paying the cost of a project which is being sold or otherwise disposed of by the joint agency in whole or in part, and for the purpose of financing any collateral posting requirements of replacement power supply arrangements, and secure the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the bonds by a pledge of part or all of the revenues derived or to be derived from all or any of its projects, and any additions and betterments thereto or extensions thereof, or from the sale of power and energy and services and facilities related to the utilization of power and energy, or from other activities or facilities permitted in this Chapter, or by a pledge of payments derived from support contracts authorized by

G.S. 159B-12

, or from contributions or advances from its members. Bonds of a joint agency shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by its governing board and spread upon its minutes.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1983, c. 574, s. 6; 1991, c. 513, s. 2; 1995, c. 412, s. 10; 2015-3, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to cost
recovery
for
acquisition
of
joint
municipal power
agency
ownership interest in generating facilities, see

G.S. 62-133.14

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-3, s. 5, effective April 2, 2015, added subsection designation (a); and added subsection (b).

§ 159B-15.
Issuance of bonds.

Each municipality and joint agency is hereby authorized to issue at one time or from time to time its bonds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any of the purposes herein authorized. The principal of, premium, if any, and the interest on bonds issued to pay the cost of a project shall be payable solely from revenues. Bonds that are not issued to pay the cost of a project shall be payable from revenues, from property pledged as security for the bonds, or from both.The bonds of each issue shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined or provided for by the Local Government Commission of North Carolina with the approval of the issuer. The bonds of each issue shall be dated and shall mature in such amounts and at such time or times, not exceeding 50 years from their respective date or dates, as may be determined by the governing board of the issuer, and may be made redeemable before maturity at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the governing board of the issuer prior to the issuance of the bonds. The governing board of the issuer shall determine the form and the manner of execution of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the State. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bond, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. The governing board of the issuer may also provide for the authentication of the bonds by a trustee or fiscal agent appointed by the issuer, or by an authenticating agent of any such trustee or fiscal agent. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in fully registered form, or both, as the governing board of the issuer may determine, and provisions may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. At the election of a joint agency, any bonds issued and sold in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter may be purchased or otherwise acquired by the joint agency and held by it in lieu of cancellation, and subsequently resold.

(a1)

Notwithstanding anything in this Chapter to the contrary, the Local Government Commission of North Carolina and the issuer (i) may authorize officers or employees of either or both thereof to fix principal amounts, maturity dates, interest rates or methods of fixing interest rates, interest payment dates, denominations, redemption rights of the issuer or holder, places of payment of principal and interest, and purchase prices of any bonds, to sell and deliver any bonds in whole or in part at one time or from time to time, and to fix other matters and procedures necessary to complete the transactions authorized, all subject to such limitations as may be prescribed by the Local Government Commission with the approval of the issuer, (ii) may approve insurance contracts, agreements for lines of credit, letters of credit, commitments to purchase bonds and any other transactions to provide security to assure, timely payment of bonds, (iii) may employ one or more persons or firms to assist in the sale of the bonds and appoint one or more banks, trust companies or any dealer in bonds, within or without the State, as depository for safekeeping and as agent for the delivery and payment of the bonds, and (iv) may provide for the payment of fees and expenses in connection with the foregoing either from the proceeds of the bonds or from other available funds.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the purposes for which such bonds have been issued, and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the governing board of the issuer may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in any trust agreement securing the same. The municipality or joint agency may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The municipality or joint agency may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall have become mutilated or shall have been destroyed or lost.

Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this Chapter without obtaining, except as otherwise expressly provided in

G.S. 159B-24

of this Chapter, the consent of the State or of any political subdivision, or of any agency, commission or instrumentality of either thereof, and without any other approvals, proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than those approvals, proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this Chapter and the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or the trust agreement securing the same.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1983, c. 574, ss. 7, 7.1; 1985, c. 266, ss. 2, 3; 1991, c. 513, s. 3; 1995, c. 412, s. 11.

§ 159B-16.
Resolution or trust agreement.

In the discretion of the governing board of the issuer, any bonds issued under the provisions of this Chapter may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the issuer and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the State. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. The trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain covenants including, but not limited to, the following:

The pledge of all or any part of the revenues derived or to be derived from the project or projects to be financed by the bonds, or from the sale or other disposition of power and energy and services and facilities related to the utilization of power and energy, or from other services or activities permitted in this Chapter, or from payments derived from support contracts authorized by

G.S. 159B-12

, or from contributions and advances from members of a joint agency, or from the electric system or other facilities of a municipality or a joint agency.

The rents, rates, fees and charges to be established, maintained, and collected, and the use and disposal of revenues, gifts, grants and funds received or to be received by the municipality or joint agency.

The setting aside of reserves and the investment, regulation and disposition thereof.

The custody, collection, securing, investment, and payment of any moneys held for the payment of bonds.

Limitations or restrictions on the purposes to which the proceeds of sale of bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied.

Limitations or restrictions on the issuance of additional bonds; the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured; or the refunding of outstanding or other bonds.

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended, the percentage of bonds the bondholders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given.

Events of default and the rights and liabilities arising thereupon, the terms and conditions upon which bonds issued under this Chapter shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

The preparation and maintenance of a budget.

The retention or employment of consulting engineers, independent auditors, and other technical consultants.

Limitations on or the prohibition of free service to any person, firm or corporation, public or private.

The acquisition and disposal of property, provided that no project or part thereof shall be mortgaged by such trust agreement or resolution.

Provisions for insurance and for accounting reports and the inspection and audit thereof.

The continuing operation and maintenance of the project or other facilities.

For bonds that are not issued to pay the cost of a project, the pledge, assignment, mortgage, or grant of a security interest in any real or personal property or interest in real or personal property, including the pledge, assignment, or grant of a security interest in money, rents, charges, or other revenues or proceeds derived by the joint agency from the sale of property, from insurance, or from a condemnation award. In the event of default on a bond secured by a pledge, assignment, mortgage, or grant of a security interest, the rights of the bond holders and the liabilities arising from the default shall be limited, except to the extent provided in a pledge of revenues, to the specific property or interest in property pledged, assigned, or mortgaged or in which a security interest was granted to secure the bonds, and no claim for any deficiency shall be made nor any deficiency judgment entered as a result of the pledge, assignment, mortgage, or grant of a security interest in the property or the interest in property.

History.

1975, c. 186, s. 1; 1983, c. 574, s. 8; 1991, c. 513, ss. 4, 5; 1995, c. 412, s. 12; 2015-3, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-3, s. 6, effective April 2, 2015, inserted “or from payments derived from support contracts authorized by

G.S. 159B-12

” in subdivision (1).